lexica/adverbs_auto_overrides.lexc
LEXICON Root

blago+Adverb+General+Comparative:blažje #;
blago+Adverb+General+Superlative:najblažje #;
blizu+Adverb+General+Comparative:bliže #;
blizu+Adverb+General+Comparative:bližje #;
blizu+Adverb+General+Superlative:najbliže #;
blizu+Adverb+General+Superlative:najbližje #;
daleč+Adverb+General+Comparative:dlje #;
daleč+Adverb+General+Superlative:najdlje #;
dobro+Adverb+General+Comparative:bolje #;
dobro+Adverb+General+Comparative:boljše #;
dobro+Adverb+General+Superlative:najbolje #;
dobro+Adverb+General+Superlative:najboljše #;
dolgo+Adverb+General+Comparative:dalj #;
dolgo+Adverb+General+Comparative:dlje #;
dolgo+Adverb+General+Superlative:najdalj #;
dolgo+Adverb+General+Superlative:najdlje #;
drago+Adverb+General+Comparative:dražje #;
drago+Adverb+General+Superlative:najdražje #;
globoko+Adverb+General+Comparative:globlje #;
globoko+Adverb+General+Superlative:najgloblje #;
grdo+Adverb+General+Comparative:grše #;
grdo+Adverb+General+Superlative:najgrše #;
hudo+Adverb+General+Comparative:huje #;
hudo+Adverb+General+Comparative:hujše #;
hudo+Adverb+General+Superlative:najhuje #;
hudo+Adverb+General+Superlative:najhujše #;
kratko+Adverb+General+Comparative:krajše #;
kratko+Adverb+General+Superlative:najkrajše #;
lahko+Adverb+General+Comparative:laže #;
lahko+Adverb+General+Comparative:lažje #;
lahko+Adverb+General+Superlative:najlaže #;
lahko+Adverb+General+Superlative:najlažje #;
lepo+Adverb+General+Comparative:lepše #;
lepo+Adverb+General+Superlative:najlepše #;
ljubo+Adverb+General+Comparative:ljubše #;
ljubo+Adverb+General+Superlative:najljubše #;
majhno+Adverb+General+Comparative:manjše #;
majhno+Adverb+General+Superlative:najmanjše #;
malokrat+Adverb+General+Comparative:manjkrat #;
malokrat+Adverb+General+Superlative:najmanjkrat #;
mlado+Adverb+General+Comparative:mlajše #;
mlado+Adverb+General+Superlative:najmlajše #;
nedolgo+Adverb+General+Comparative:nedalje #;
nedolgo+Adverb+General+Comparative:nedaljše #;
nedolgo+Adverb+General+Superlative:najnedalje #;
nedolgo+Adverb+General+Superlative:najnedaljše #;
nedrago+Adverb+General+Comparative:nedražje #;
nedrago+Adverb+General+Superlative:najnedražje #;
nelahko+Adverb+General+Comparative:nelaže #;
nelahko+Adverb+General+Comparative:nelažje #;
nelahko+Adverb+General+Superlative:najnelaže #;
nelahko+Adverb+General+Superlative:najnelažje #;
nelepo+Adverb+General+Comparative:nelepše #;
nelepo+Adverb+General+Superlative:najnelepše #;
neljubo+Adverb+General+Comparative:neljubše #;
neljubo+Adverb+General+Superlative:najneljubše #;
nemajhno+Adverb+General+Comparative:nemanjše #;
nemajhno+Adverb+General+Superlative:najnemanjše #;
nerad+Adverb+General+Positive:nerada #;
nerad+Adverb+General+Positive:nerade #;
nerad+Adverb+General+Positive:neradi #;
nerad+Adverb+General+Positive:nerado #;
nizko+Adverb+General+Comparative:niže #;
nizko+Adverb+General+Comparative:nižje #;
nizko+Adverb+General+Superlative:najniže #;
nizko+Adverb+General+Superlative:najnižje #;
ozko+Adverb+General+Comparative:ože #;
ozko+Adverb+General+Comparative:ožje #;
ozko+Adverb+General+Superlative:najože #;
ozko+Adverb+General+Superlative:najožje #;
poceni+Adverb+General+Comparative:ceneje #;
poceni+Adverb+General+Comparative:cenejše #;
poceni+Adverb+General+Superlative:najceneje #;
poceni+Adverb+General+Superlative:najcenejše #;
počasi+Adverb+General+Comparative:počasneje #;
počasi+Adverb+General+Superlative:najpočasneje #;
počasno+Adverb+General+Comparative:počasneje #;
počasno+Adverb+General+Superlative:najpočasneje #;
preveliko+Adverb+General+Positive:preveč #;
preveč+Adverb+General+Positive:preveč #;
rad+Adverb+General+Positive:rada #;
rad+Adverb+General+Positive:rade #;
rad+Adverb+General+Positive:radi #;
rad+Adverb+General+Positive:rado #;
slabo+Adverb+General+Comparative:slabše #;
slabo+Adverb+General+Superlative:najslabše #;
sladko+Adverb+General+Comparative:slaje #;
sladko+Adverb+General+Comparative:slajše #;
sladko+Adverb+General+Superlative:najslaje #;
sladko+Adverb+General+Superlative:najslajše #;
strogo+Adverb+General+Comparative:strože #;
strogo+Adverb+General+Comparative:strožje #;
strogo+Adverb+General+Superlative:najstrože #;
strogo+Adverb+General+Superlative:najstrožje #;
tanko+Adverb+General+Comparative:tanje #;
tanko+Adverb+General+Comparative:tanjše #;
tanko+Adverb+General+Superlative:najtanje #;
tanko+Adverb+General+Superlative:najtanjše #;
težko+Adverb+General+Comparative:teže #;
težko+Adverb+General+Comparative:težje #;
težko+Adverb+General+Superlative:najteže #;
težko+Adverb+General+Superlative:najtežje #;
tiho+Adverb+General+Comparative:tiše #;
tiho+Adverb+General+Comparative:tišje #;
tiho+Adverb+General+Superlative:najtiše #;
tiho+Adverb+General+Superlative:najtišje #;
trdo+Adverb+General+Comparative:trše #;
trdo+Adverb+General+Superlative:najtrše #;
visoko+Adverb+General+Comparative:više #;
visoko+Adverb+General+Comparative:višje #;
visoko+Adverb+General+Superlative:najviše #;
visoko+Adverb+General+Superlative:najvišje #;
široko+Adverb+General+Comparative:širše #;
široko+Adverb+General+Superlative:najširše #;
